Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5122.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-28 of the General Laws entitled "Broadband Deployment and
Investment Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-28-8. Broadband community outreach coordinator -- Affordable connectivity
program.
There is hereby established, within the division of public utilities, a broadband community
outreach coordinator to assist state residents interested in learning more and/or applying for, the
federal Affordable Connectivity Program.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000103
========